Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 43. ORAL HEALTH IMPROVEMENT

Sec. 43.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Texas Oral Health Improvement Act.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.002. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter be construed liberally so that eligible individuals may receive appropriate and adequate oral health services in a timely manner.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.003. DEFINITIONS. (a) In this chapter:

(1) "Dentist" means an individual licensed by the State Board of Dental Examiners to practice dentistry in this state.

(2) "Oral health services" means oral health education and promotion activities.

(3) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2021.

(4) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2021.

(5) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2021.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule may define a word or term not defined by Subsection (a) as necessary to administer this chapter. The executive commissioner may not define a word or term so that the word or term is inconsistent or in conflict with the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0159, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.004. ORAL HEALTH IMPROVEMENT SERVICES PROGRAM. (a) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2021.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2021.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2021.

(d) The department may establish an oral health services program that may consist of all or any combination of the following:

(1) a program of oral disease prevention, including:

(A) the fluoridation of community water supplies;

(B) fluoride mouth rinse programs in schools; and

(C) the promotion and implementation of sealants programs;

(2) oral health education and promotion, including:

(A) public health education to promote the prevention of oral disease through self-help methods, including the initiation and expansion of preschool, school age, and adult education programs;

(B) organized continuing health education training programs for health care providers; and

(C) preventive health education information for the public; and

(3) facilitation of access to oral health services, including:

(A) the improvement of the existing oral health services delivery system for the provision of services to low-income residents;

(B) outreach activities to inform the public of the type and availability of oral health services to increase the accessibility of oral health care for low-income residents; and

(C) assistance and cooperation in promoting better distribution of dentists and other oral health professionals throughout the state.

(e) The department may provide services only as prescribed by department rules.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0160, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 1(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (S.B. 970), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.005. ADMINISTRATION. (a) The department shall:

(1) administer the program of oral health services; and

(2) develop the design and content of all forms necessary for the program.

(b) The department may conduct field research, collect data, and prepare statistical and other reports relating to the need for and the availability of oral health services.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0161, eff. April 2, 2015.